Louisiana, session 2026, HB1149.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:280.4 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§280.4. Artificial intelligence; required instruction
A. Each public school shall incorporate instruction on artificial intelligence
into an existing course of study for students in grades six through twelve.
B. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules as necessary for the implementation of this Section in accordance
with the Administrative Procedure Act.